Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-572
Hunt through the Internet; prohibited acts; confiscation and forfeiture of contraband.

(1) No person shall hunt through the Internet.

(2) No person shall host hunting through the Internet or otherwise enable another person to hunt through the Internet.

(3) Any conservation officer or any person specifically employed or designated by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service may offer to host or otherwise enable another person to hunt through the Internet for the sole purpose of obtaining evidence of a violation of this section.

(4) Any firearm, computer, equipment, appliance, or conveyance used in violation of this section is contraband and shall be confiscated and forfeited to the state upon seizure by law enforcement authorities.

Laws 2007, LB504, § 3.